sv: Linsfärg/toning: Bärnsten; Svart; Blå; Klar; Grön; Speglad; Flerfärgad/regnbåge; Fotokromatisk; Rökfärgad/grå; Gul; Övrigt
sk-SK: Farba/odtieň skiel: Jantárová; Čierna; Modrá; Číra; Zelená; Zrkadlová; Viacfarebná/dúhová; Fotochromatická; Dymová/sivá; Žltá; Iné
ro-RO: Culoarea / nuanța lentilei: Chihlimbar; Negru; Albastru; Transparent; Verde; Oglindă; Multicolor/Curcubeu; Fotocromatic; Fumuriu/Gri; Galben; Altele
lt-LT: Lęšių spalva / atspalvis: Gintarinė; Juoda; Mėlyna; Skaidri; Žalia; Veidrodinė; Daugiaspalvė / vaivorykštinė; Fotochrominė; Dūmų / pilka; Geltona; Kita
th: สี/โทนสีของเลนส์: สีอำพัน; สีดำ; สีน้ำเงิน; ใส; สีเขียว; เคลือบปรอท; หลากหลายสี/สีรุ้ง; เปลี่ยนสีอัตโนมัติ; สีควัน/สีเทา; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
tr: Lens rengi/tonu: Kehribar; Siyah; Mavi; Şeffaf; Yeşil; Aynalı; Çok renkli/Gökkuşağı; Fotokromik; Duman/Gri; Sarı; Diğer
it: Colore/tinta delle lenti: Ambra; Nero; Blu; Trasparente; Verde; Specchiato; Multicolore/arcobaleno; Fotocromatico; Fumé/grigio; Giallo; Altro
de: Linsenfarbe/-tönung: Bernstein; Schwarz; Blau; Transparent; Grün; Verspiegelt; Mehrfarbig/Regenbogen; Selbsttönend; Rauchgrau; Gelb; Sonstige
en: Lens color/tint: Amber; Black; Blue; Clear; Green; Mirrored; Multicolor/Rainbow; Photochromic; Smoke/Grey; Yellow; Other
pt-PT: Cor/tonalidade da lente: Âmbar; Preto; Azul; Transparente; Verde; Espelhado; Multicor/arco-íris; Fotocromático; Fumo/cinzento; Amarelo; Outro
pl: Kolor/odcień soczewki: Bursztynowy; Czarny; Niebieski; Przezroczysty; Zielony; Lustrzany; Wielokolorowy / tęczowy; Fotochromowy; Dymiony / szary; Żółty; Inne
bg-BG: Цвят/оттенък на лещата: Кехлибарен; Черен; Син; Прозрачен; Зелен; Огледален; Многоцветен/Дъга; Фотохромен; Опушен/Сив; Жълт; Друг
ko: 렌즈 색상/색조: 호박색; 검정색; 파란색; 투명색; 녹색; 미러; 다색/무지개; 변색; 스모크/그레이; 노란색; 기타
sl-SI: Barva/zatemnitev leče: Jantarna; Črna; Modra; Prozorna; Zelena; Zrcalna; Večbarvna/Mavrična; Fotokromatska; Dimna/Siva; Rumena; Drugo
nb: Linsefarge/-toning: Ravfarget; Svart; Blå; Gjennomsiktig; Grønn; Speilet; Flerfarget/regnbue; Fotokromisk; Røyk/grå; Gul; Annet
fi: Linssin väri/sävy: Meripihka; Musta; Sininen; Läpinäkyvä; Vihreä; Peilattu; Monivärinen/Sateenkaari; Fotokromaattinen; Savu/Harmaa; Keltainen; Muu
hu: Lencse színe/árnyalata: Borostyánsárga; Fekete; Kék; Átlátszó; Zöld; Tükrös; Többszínű/szivárványos; Fotokróm; Füstszínű/szürke; Sárga; Egyéb
da: Linsefarve/toning: Ravfarvet; Sort; Blå; Gennemsigtig; Grøn; Spejlet; Flerfarvet/regnbue; Fotokromisk; Røgfarvet/grå; Gul; Andet
vi: Màu/sắc độ của tròng kính: Hổ phách; màu đen; màu xanh dương; Trong suốt; màu xanh lá cây; Tráng gương; Nhiều màu/Cầu vồng; Đổi màu theo ánh sáng; Màu khói/Xám; màu vàng; Khác
hr-HR: Boja/nijansa leće: Jantarna; Crna; Plava; Prozirna; Zelena; Zrcalna; Višebojna/dugina; Fotokromatska; Dimna/siva; Žuta; Ostalo
es: Color/tono del lente: Ámbar; Negro; Azul; Transparente; Verde; Espejado; Multicolor/arcoíris; Fotocromático; Ahumado/gris; Amarillo; Otro
ja: レンズの色／色合い: アンバー; 黒; 青; 透明; 緑; ミラー; マルチカラー/レインボー; 調光; スモーク/グレー; 黄色; その他
ru: Цвет и оттенок линз: Янтарный; Черный; Синий; Прозрачный; Зеленый; Зеркальный; Многоцветный/радужный; Фотохромный; Дымчатый/серый; Желтый; Другое
cs: Barva čočky/tónování: Jantarová; Černá; Modrá; Průhledná; Zelená; Zrcadlová; Vícebarevná/duhová; Fotochromatická; Kouřová/šedá; Žlutá; Jiné
nl: Lens kleur/tint: Amber; Zwart; Blauw; Transparant; Groen; Spiegelend; Meerkleurig/regenboog; Fotochromisch; Smoke/grijs; Geel; Overig
fr: Couleur ou teinte des verres: Ambré; Noir; Bleu; Transparent; Vert; Miroir; Multicolore/Arc-en-ciel; Photochromique; Fumé/Gris; Jaune; Autre
zh-CN: 镜片颜色/色调: 琥珀色; 黑色; 蓝色; 透明; 绿色; 镜面; 多色/彩虹色; 光致变色; 烟熏色/灰色; 黄色; 其他
el: Χρώμα/απόχρωση φακού: Κεχριμπάρι; Μαύρο; Μπλε; Διάφανο; Πράσινο; Καθρέφτης; Πολύχρωμο/Ουράνιο τόξο; Φωτοχρωμικό; Φιμέ/Γκρι; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Lente cor/tonalidade: Âmbar; Preto; Azul; Transparente; Verde; Espelhado; Multicolorido/arco-íris; Fotocromático; Fumê/cinza; Amarelo; Outro
zh-TW: 鏡片顏色/色調: 琥珀色; 黑色; 藍色; 透明; 綠色; 鏡面; 多色/彩虹色; 變色; 煙燻色/灰色; 黃色; 其他